Tennessee, session 114, SB2097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The secretary of state shall direct each county election commission to
include on the ballot for the November general election in 2026 the following question:
Should the State of Tennessee legalize the sale, possession, and use of medical
cannabis?
(b) The ballot question must include a mechanism by which a voter may answer
the question by selecting "YES" or "NO."
(c) The secretary of state shall compile the results of the ballot question and
submit the results to each member of the general assembly.
(d) The results of the ballot question are not binding on the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2097
012120
- 1 -